Utah statutes.
13-25a-104.   Prohibited conduct for facsimiles -- Exceptions.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person may not operate or
authorize the operation of a facsimile machine to send an advertisement.
(2)  A person may operate a facsimile machine if the advertisement is sent:
(a)  with the prior express written consent of the person who receives the
facsimile agreeing to receive the facsimile from a specific solicitor; or
(b)  to a person with whom the solicitor has an established business
relationship.
(3)  A person may not make or authorize the sending of an advertisement by
facsimile in violation of Title 47 U.S.C. 227.
